Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(1) Many individuals and families experience  life circumstances that necessitate court
involvement and visits to local governmental offices, including but not limited to juvenile
dependency and delinquency proceedings, domestic relations cases, protective proceedings
related to domestic abuse or violence, child protection proceedings, meetings with  probation
officers and visits to local governmental offices to transact governmental business.
(2) Often individuals and families  in such matters are responsible for the care of young
children and obtaining child care can distract from,  if not present obstacles or barriers to,
effective and complete  participation in court proceedings or dealing with important govern-
mental matters.
(3) Individuals and families in court-related matters also  need and would benefit from the
availability of a clearinghouse for information and resource referrals  relating to family sup-
port services within the local community.
(4) The availability of programs to provide quality  child care and serve as a clearinghouse
for information and resource referrals in facilities located in or  near courthouses and gov-
ernmental offices would benefit individuals and families with court-related  matters and gov-
ernmental business to transact and would ensure that individuals and families with children
are able to participate fully in court and governmental processes in this state.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Child care” means care and supervision provided to a child between six weeks and
10 years of age on behalf of a person with responsibility for the child.
(b) “CourtCare program”  means a program that provides child care and serves as a
clearinghouse for information and resource referrals for individuals  and families with
court-related matters or governmental business in or near  a county courthouse or court-
house complex.
(2) Marion and Polk Counties  may establish one or more CourtCare programs as pilot
programs to provide quality child care to individuals and families who are:
(a) Participating in or serving as jurors in court proceedings at the local courthouse; or
(b) Transacting  business at a local governmental office in or near a county courthouse
or courthouse complex.
(3) A CourtCare  program established under subsection (2) of this section must also serve
as a clearinghouse for  information and resource referrals relating to family support services
Enrolled House Bill 3067 (HB 3067-A) Page 1
that are available to individuals and families in the local community, including but not lim-
ited to housing, emergency services, early learning programs,  parent education, public
health, relief nurseries, health insurance, behavioral health services,  legal assistance,
screening and referral services for developmental  health and referrals to community organ-
ization as appropriate.
(4) A CourtCare program established under subsection  (2) of this section must ensure
that:
(a) Children receive quality child care and are in a safe and nurturing environment while
their caretakers are participating in court proceedings or  transacting local governmental
business;
(b) Staff at the CourtCare program site are able to provide  information and make refer-
rals to appropriate local area resources; and
(c) Court and local governmental business continues without interruption or  distraction
from children cared for in the CourtCare program.
(5) If Marion or Polk County establishes a  CourtCare program under this section, the
county shall ensure that:
(a) Volunteers, employees and staff at the CourtCare  program are enrolled in the Central
Background Registry under ORS 329A.030; and
(b) The CourtCare program  is either certified under ORS 329A.280 or registered under
ORS 329A.330 by the Office of Child Care or is exempt from the requirements for certification
or registration under ORS 329A.250.
(6) If Marion or Polk County establishes a  CourtCare program under this section, the
county shall enter  into an agreement with a nonprofit or nongovernmental entity to imple-
ment and administer the CourtCare program. At a minimum, the contract  must require that
the nonprofit or nongovernmental entity report to the county on an annual basis regarding
outcomes and objectives that include, but are not limited to:
(a) The number of individuals and families utilizing the CourtCare program;
(b) The type of services provided  to individuals and families that utilized the CourtCare
program;
(c) Unmet needs and barriers to the provision of services in the CourtCare program;
(d) The effect of the CourtCare program on courtroom, judicial and  local government
efficiency; and
(e) The types of information and resource referrals provided by the CourtCare program.
SECTION 3.
The governing  bodies of Marion and Polk Counties shall report on the
progress of CourtCare pilot programs implemented under section 2 of this 2017 Act, in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  re-
lated to child welfare no later than September 15, 2019.
SECTION 4.
Sections 1 to 3 of this 2017 Act are repealed on January 2, 2021.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $200,000, for distribution to Marion and Polk
Counties to be used to implement CourtCare pilot programs as described in section 2 of  this
2017 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2017.
Enrolled House Bill 3067 (HB 3067-A) Page 2
Passed by House July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3067 (HB 3067-A) Page 3